Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-576
Agency or political subdivision; dark fiber; sale.

Any agency or political subdivision of the state may sell its dark fiber by any method, including auction, sealed bid, or public sale, which it deems to be most advantageous to the public. The sales agreement may require that the agency or political subdivision be solely responsible for the maintenance of the dark fiber and that the buyer is responsible, on a pro rata basis, for any such maintenance costs.

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2303;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 346.